Connecticut, session 2026, HB05190.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
three hundred fifty thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be
used by the Department of Veterans Affairs for the purpose of providing
a grant-in-aid to the Veterans Rally Point in the city of Norwich for
capital improvements.